notebooks/resources/HFST/roka.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc

LEXICON Root						
Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
rok N4dekl;

LEXICON N4dekl					
+N+Sg+Nom:^a  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^as #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ai #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^as  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ām #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^as #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ās #;
